test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_anneed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - anneeđ: # not checked
    anneeđ+V+Inf: anneeđ
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anam
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: anah
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aṇa
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: anneen
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: aṇevettee
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: anneev
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: anneep
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aṇevetteđ
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aṇeh
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: anneeim
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: anneeih
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aneej
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: anneeáim
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: anneeáid
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: anneeáin
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aneeim
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: aneejd
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: anneeii
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Sg1: anneeččim
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Sg2: anneeččih
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Sg3: anneeččij
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Du1: anneeččáim
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Du2: anneeččáid
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Du3: anneeččáin
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Pl1: anneeččijm
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Pl2: anneeččijd
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Pl3: anneeččii
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Sg1: anneeeem
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Sg2: anneeeeh
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Sg3: annee
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Du1: anneeeen
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Du2: anneevettee
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Du3: anneeuv
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Pl1: anneeep
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Pl2: anneevetteđ
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Pl3: anneeeh
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    anneeđ+V+PrsPrc: anneeee
    anneeđ+V+PrfPrc: anneem
    anneeđ+V+Actio: anneem
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Ess: anneemin
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Loc: anneemist
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    anneeđ+V+Ger: anneedijn
    anneeđ+V+VAbess: [anneehennáá, anneehinnáá, anneehánnáá]


  Verb - jotteeđ: # not checked
    jotteeđ+V+Inf: jotteeđ
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođám
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jođáh
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jotá
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: jotteen
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: jotevettee
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: jotteev
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: jotteep
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jotevetteđ
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: joteh
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jotteeim
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: jotteeih
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: joteej
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: jotteeáim
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: jotteeáid
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: jotteeáin
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: joteeim
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: joteejd
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: jotteeii
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Sg1: jotteeččim
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Sg2: jotteeččih
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Sg3: jotteeččij
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Du1: jotteeččáim
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Du2: jotteeččáid
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Du3: jotteeččáin
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Pl1: jotteeččijm
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Pl2: jotteeččijd
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Pl3: jotteeččii
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Sg1: jotteeeem
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Sg2: jotteeeeh
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Sg3: jottee
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Du1: jotteeeen
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Du2: jotteevettee
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Du3: jotteeuv
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Pl1: jotteeep
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Pl2: jotteevetteđ
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Pl3: jotteeeh
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+PrsPrc: jotteeee
    jotteeđ+V+PrfPrc: jotteem
    jotteeđ+V+Actio: jotteem
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Ess: jotteemin
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Loc: jotteemist
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    jotteeđ+V+Ger: jotteedijn
    jotteeđ+V+VAbess: jotteehennáá
    jotteeđ+V+VAbess: jotteehinnáá
    jotteeđ+V+VAbess: jotteehánnáá


  Verb - kalveđ: # not checked
    kalveđ+V+Inf: kalveđ
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaˊlvam
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kaˊlvah
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalva
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kalveen
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kalvevettee
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kalvev
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kalvep
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kalvevetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalveh
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kalveim
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kalveih
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kalvij
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kalveáim
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kalveáid
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kalveáin
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kalviim
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kalvijd
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kalviii
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kalveččim
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kalveččih
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kalveččij
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Du1: kalveččáim
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Du2: kalveččáid
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Du3: kalveččáin
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kalveččijm
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kalveččijd
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kalveččii
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kalveeem
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kalveeeh
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kalve
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Du1: kalveeen
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Du2: kalvevettee
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Du3: kalveuv
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kalveep
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kalvevetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kalveeh
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    kalveđ+V+PrsPrc: kalveee
    kalveđ+V+PrfPrc: kalvem
    kalveđ+V+Actio: kalvem
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Ess: kalvemin
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Loc: kalvemist
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    kalveđ+V+Ger: kalvedijn
    kalveđ+V+VAbess: kalvehennáá
    kalveđ+V+VAbess: kalvehinnáá
    kalveđ+V+VAbess: kalvehánnáá
